Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB940.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Lactation Rooms in Commonwealth Buildings Act.Section 2. Findings.The General Assembly finds that:(1) The Commonwealth intends to comply with Federal and State laws, regulations and policies, including:(i) 40 U.S.C. § 3318, which defines a lactation room;(ii) Section 4207 of the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (42 U.S.C. § 18001 et seq.);(iii) Section 218d of the Fair Labor Standards Act, 29 U.S.C. § 218d (relating to breastfeeding accommodations in the workplace), which contains 123456789101112131415161718 requirements for providing accommodations for nursing mothers; and(iv) Human Resources Policy HR-WS001, Nursing Mothers Rooms which establishes a Commonwealth-wide policy that accommodates nursing people who wish to express breast milk while at work.(2) This chapter expands those guidelines to all Commonwealth buildings.(3) Breastfeeding a baby is an important and basic act of nurturing that must be protected.(4) A space should be provided in Commonwealth buildings for individuals who need to express breastmilk or perform nursing for a child.Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Commonwealth building." A building owned or leased by the Commonwealth that contains offices in which officers or employees of the Executive, Legislative or Judicial branch of the Commonwealth or of an independent agency or State-affiliated entity, as those terms are defined in 62 Pa.C.S. § 103 (relating to definitions), perform official duties and functions."Department." The Department of General Services of the Commonwealth."Lactation room." A hygienic place, other than a bathroom, that:(1) is shielded from view;(2) is free from intrusion; and(3) contains a chair, a working surface, and, if the 20250SB0940PN1080 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 public building is otherwise supplied with electricity, an electrical outlet."Parent." An individual who is able to express breastmilk and is currently providing breastmilk for a nursing child, regardless of whether the individual has legal custody of the child.Section 4. Lactation rooms required.(a) Duty of department.--The department shall ensure that a Commonwealth building has at least one lactation room and that the lactation room complies with the requirements established in this act and Federal law. To maintain privacy and avoid the appearance of impropriety, the lactation room may be the same used by employees for the same purpose.(b) Notice.--Notice to the public regarding the location and access to a lactation room shall be posted in areas and designated signage standards of the department.(c) Mandatory specifications.--A lactation room shall comply with the following specifications:(1) Be in a location that complies with the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. § 12101 et seq.). All accessories, equipment, furniture and casework shall be provided and installed to comply with the requirements of that act, including accessibility clearances and regulations.(2) Have a minimum square footage of 80 net usable square feet.(3) Have a privacy latch or locking door hardware, or both, so that the door can be locked from the inside.(4) Provide visual privacy to the space by modifying or covering windows, sidelights and doors.(5) Provide sound privacy to the space to minimize sound 20250SB0940PN1080 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 transmission into adjacent spaces, including, if possible, using sound attenuation insulation.(6) Include a chair and table, countertop or desk. The chair must be upholstered, cushioned, have armrests, a high back and be of standard seating height.(7) Provide at least one electrical duplex outlet next to where an individual may be seated.(8) Contain a waste receptacle.(9) Meet standard office-level illumination and ventilation requirements.(10) Not be a restroom, toilet stall, storage room or janitor's closet.(d) Discretionary specifications.--The following specifications may be included in a lactation room:(1) A sink or be adjacent to a kitchenette, breakroom or women's restroom with a sink installed in casework to provide the space necessary to clean equipment and containers.(2) A refrigerator.(3) Additional electrical outlets throughout the room for greater flexibility in room use and furniture placement, including GFI outlets near a sink location.(4) A paper towel and soap dispenser or, if the room does not contain a sink, a wet wipe dispenser.(5) Outlets for voice or data access to allow for possible multipurpose use.(6) A mirror, that is, if possible, full-length.(7) Lockers or other facilities to store personal items and equipment.(8) A coat hook.(9) Exterior hardware that displays the word "occupied" 20250SB0940PN1080 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 when the door is locked.(10) Additional seating area for children accompanying a breastfeeding parent, which may include a play table, books or toys.(11) Central air conditioning or a working air conditioning unit.(e) Construction.--Nothing in this act shall be construed as establishing a right of an individual to enter a Commonwealth building.Section 5. Effective date.This act shall take effect in six months.20250SB0940PN1080 - 5 - 1234567891011